District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.04

Competitive sealed proposals.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 304, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(l), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 119(d), 47 DCR 520
Sept. 16, 2000, D.C. Law 13-155, § 2(c), 47 DCR 5035
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1183.4.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Procurement Practices Human Care Agreement Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-348, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 5009).